third/tetex/texmf/tex/generic/hyphen/nehyph2.tex
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
% These are TeX hyphenation patterns for Dutch generated at the
% Computer Science Department of Utrecht University.
% Padualaan 14, P.O. Box 80.089, 3508 TB Utrecht, The Netherlands.
% Telephone: +31-30-531454, e-mail: postmaster@cs.ruu.nl
%
% Copyright (c) 1989 by CELEX.
% CELEX, Wundtlaan 1, 6525 XD Nijmegen, The Netherlands.
% Telephone: +31-80-515751, email: celex@hnympi52.bitnet
%
% General permission for non-profit usage is granted.
% For commercial usage contact CELEX at the above address.
% Copying of this file is only permitted with inclusion of
% this copyright notice and with these same restrictions.
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
\patterns{%
.aan5
.aard5a
.aard5r
.aarts5
.ab5l
.ad3ek
.ad3eq
.ad3op
.ad3or
.ad5ren
.ad3s
.af3ra
.al3f
.aller5
.al5m
.al4st
.am3p
.an3d4
.an4kl
.an5od
.an3th
.ap2n
.ar3tr
.as3p
.as1t
.as5th
.as3tr
.at5j
.at4r
.ba3ta
.be3la
.be5lo
.berg5l
.bij1
.bit5se
.bli4
.boot5j
.bu2s
.ca4te.
.cater5
.ce4len
.co4ler
.culot4
.daar5
.da4gi
.dag3r
.da4k
.de2a
.denk5r
.de3ra
.de3ro
.des5p
.de5sta
.di4s
.dom5o
.du5et
.edel5a
.ed3w
.ek3s
.ek4w
.elo3
.en3t
.er5aa
.er4f3l
.erop3
.ert4
.er3ui
.es3
.eu5t
.exi1
.gaat3
.ga4me.
.ge3f
.ge3la
.ge5le
.ge5lo
.ge3n4a
.ge5ne
.ge5no
.ge3r4a
.ge5r4e
.ges4
.ge3sk
.gram5e
.haar5s
.hand5a
.handels5
.hand5s
.he2a
.he2r
.her3i
.her3u
.ho4les
.ho4met
.honing5
.hy4de
.ij2s
.ij4s3l
.ijs5t
.ima4ge
.in1
.in3d4
.in5g
.ingeni5
.ink4
.innes5
.in3s4
.in3t
.jes2
.ka4taa
.ka4te.
.ke5na
.ke3ra
.ker4kl
.kerk5u
.kerst5r
.klok5
.koot5
.kort5a
.krop5a
.lak5l
.la5th
.lead5
.le4b
.leef5
.le4go
.le4gr
.lek5w
.le5ni
.len4s
.lente5
.les3
.le3th
.lip5l
.long5a
.loot5
.los5
.luit4
.mede5
.mein3
.me5li
.melk5o
.mer4k5l
.me3so
.miet5j
.mij4n5i
.mo4s
.mos3k
.na3fl
.na1s
.negen5
.nes5tel
.ne4t5j
.no5t
.och3
.oe4r
.oe4s3
.olf4
.olie3
.om1a
.on1
.on3i
.on3s
.on2t
.ont5ee
.ont5eren
.ont5ra
.ont5rol
.op5at
.op5r
.over5e
.over5s
.pa2k
.pee5tj
.peri5
.pe4te.
.piet5j
.prik3
.puit4
.qua5d
.quit4
.raat4
.ran4ch
.read3
.record5
.rei4s5
.re4mol
.re5na
.re5s4cr
.res3p
.reu5t
.rie4t5a
.rijk4s
.rij5sp
.ring5s
.ro4l
.ro4q
.ro4sk
.sa4p
.sce4ne
.seig5
.se4st
.se2t
.sha4
.sha5ker
.sis5t
.ski3s
.slee5tj
.sli2
.snap3
.so4v5
.spoor5
.st2
.ste4m3
.ster5an
.sty4
.sul3
.taart5j
.taat4
.tan4da
.ta3ro
.te4f
.tek2
.te5nor
.ten4tj
.te4ra
.ter4pa
.tes5tat
.thee3
.tic5k
.ti4me
.ti4na
.to2s
.traat4
.tros5
.ts4
.tu4ne.
.ui2
.ui3le
.uit1
.uit4je
.vaat5j
.van3o
.veld3
.ven5s
.ven4t5j
.ver1
.ve5ring
.ver5sta
.vet5r
.volg5or
.vu4l3
.was3t
.weet5
.we2l
.wel3o
.wet4s
.work3
.xe1
.ya2l
.zend5a
.zes3
.zit3
a4a4
aad3a
aad3o
aad3r
aaf5a
aag1
aag3r
aags4
aag5so
aai1
aak1
aak3l
aak5n
aak3r
aak3w
aal1a
2aald
aal1e
aal3k
aal1o
4aalr
aal5sc
4aalv
aam1
aan1
aan3a
5aandee
aan5g
5aangi
1aanj
aan5k
5aann
5aansla
aan3sp
5aanta
5aanvr
3aanwi
aanzet5
aap1a
aar1
5aardapp
aar4th
aart5ro
aas3e
aas3f
aas3p
aat3a
aat3h
aat3o
aat3r
a1b
abak4s3
aba4s
abe4la
ab5err
ab5ijz
able2
a4ble.
a4bles
3abonn
ab3ru
4ace
a2ce.
a3cee
a3cep
a4cer.
a4cers
a4ces
5aceta
2ach.
a3cha
2a1che
4a1chi
a1cho
a3chr
4achs
a1chu
2acl
2aco
2acr
4acs
acu5e
a1d
2ad.
ad2a
ad3aa
ad3ad
ada5g
ada2r3
a4dete
ade4tj
2adi
2adl
5admini
ad3ora
2adp
3adres
a5dri
ad5rol
ad3sla
ad5uit
4ady
2ae
aege4
aek4
ael4
a4fau
af3d
af1dw
4afe
af3ei
afe4la
a2f5ep
af5ex
1afg
2afi
a4fin
af3l
2afo
afon4d
af1r
af3ric
af5rie
af3ris
af3rit
af3ru
af3s
5afsl
5aftr
a4fu
3afzet
4aga
ag1ad
agas4s
age2o
a4gins
agis5t
ag3le
ag3ord
ag3reg
ag3roo
ag3sla
ag4spr
ag5ur
a4g3uu
a1h
4ah.
ahe5ri
ah3l
ah5r
ai1e
aig4
aik4
ails4
ai4lu
2ais4
ai5sa
ai3sc
ais5k
ai1so
ai4sol
ai1t
4a1j
2ak.
5akade
ak3arb
a4ked
aker4se
a2kes
a2kez
2akh
akhou4
ak3id
a2k1l
ak3la
ak3lo
ak3na
ak3ne
a4kog
ak3ond
4akp
2aks
4aks.
5aksij
ak5spa
ak1st
4akt.
ak5uu
ak3we
a1la
a5lal
alan4st
a4lap
5album
2ald
a2lel
a4lents
al2fe
alf3l
alf2r
4alia
alie5tj
al4kank
al4kro
al4mac
5almana
al4mol
a1lo
al3omt
alo4n
al5ou
al3ph
als3j
al2sl
als5m
als3oo
al4stem
al4sti
al3tha
al4t5ro
a1lu
5amandel
4ambe
1ambt
ame4ran
3ameu
4amm
am5pe
am2pl
ampoo5
ams5ap
am4se
am4sm
am4sn
am2sp
am3spe
an2aa
an4af
a2na2g
a5nagen
an5alge
a4n5ame
an3arc
an4ded
2andj
and4ri
a4nec
an3emi
a3nen
an3est
an4gan
an4gap
anges4
ange5st
ang5le
an2gr
ang5ste
a3ni
ani5t
5anjelie
4ank.
an4kaa
an4kak
an4kas
anker5k
ank5ins
an4kna
an4k5of
an2kr
ank3ro
ank5wet
annet4
an5opt
an5ort
ano3st
an3scr
an2so
an2sp
5antenn
antes4
ant2h
an3tha
an5to
ants5ta
anu5e
an5ui
an5ur
a4nuu
anval4s
a1o
a2ob
a4op4
4ap.
a1pa
a2pe.
a4ped
ap3j
ap3le
a1plu
a1po
apo5p
1appa
5appels
3appr
a1pr
a4p3rij
april3
ap2sl
ap2sp
2apu
a1py
a1q
a4ques
4ar.
a1ra
ara5ce
ara5kl
a4r5app
5archief
5arctic
ar2da
ard3ac
ard3ol
ard3op
ar2dr
ar4dran
ard3ri
ard3w
a4rew
arg3l
3argum
a1ri
ari4an.
ari4ce
ariet4
ari5ett
arkeer5
ar3k4l
2arl
ar4map
ar4mu
ar4nes
a1ro
2aroo
ar5s2e
ar4s1l
ars3la
ars3m
ar2sn
ar5sni
ar2so
ar4spa
ar4spr
ars5tal
ar4stek
ar4str
ar4tak
ar4tap
art5een
5artike
ar2tj
ar4top
ar2tr
art4sl
arts5le
a3rus
a1ry
4asa
asal4
as1ap
a2sc
as4ch
as4cr
a2seb
a2sec
as4ee
a2sel
a3sem
as4en
as2hi
asi4on.
asis5t
a2sl
as3lam
as3lan
as3li
aslijs4
as3m
as3pa
as5pect.
as5pecte
as5per
as3pi
as3pl
assi3s
3assoc
5assu
as1ta
as3tan
a5stat
a4s3te
as4th
as3ti
as5tic
as3ton
ast5red
a1t
at1ac
a4talen
ata1s
a4taz
5atelier
ate4rec
ate4rek
ateri5el
ater5ijs
4atg
at2ha
a3thar
atie5s4
a2tj
3atlas
3atmos
2atn
a2t3re
a3trek
at2sl
at4slo
ats5lot
ats5m
at5sni
at2sp
at4stak
at4sti
at4stre
at2tu
2au
4au.
au1ch
au3e
3aug
au3kr
auli4ne
aul4le
aup2
au5ph
aur2
au5re
4aus
au3sa
au5so
au1t4
3auto
au1wi
4auz
a1v
ava5ne
ava5str
aven3s
ave3re
ave3ri
aver4u
a3vi
avil4l
1avo
5avond
4avot
a1w
aw5re
4ay
ay4a
a1z
aze3s
aze5tj
5azia
1ba
baar3t
babe4
babet4
ba4ch
ba4da
ba4des
ba4dr
bag4h
ba4ka
bal4kla
ba3na
ban4d5r
band5s
ba4ne.
ban4kl
ban4kn
ban4k3o
ban4kr
bank3w
ban4q
ba5ru
baseli4
bassi4
bas3t
2b1b
bbe4lag
bbe4lee
bbe4n
2b1c
2b1d
3be
be3am
be4art
be3dw
beet1
be3g4
beien5
beis4
bei4tj
be3ke
be3kl
be4lex
bel5f
bel3k
bel3sp
be1ra
be5r2e
ber4g5af
ber4g5et
bergi4
ber4gl
ber4gr
ber5na
be1r2o
ber5oc
be4ron
bers4k
ber4sto
be5ru
be1s4
bes5ac
bes5k
be3sm
bes5s
bes5te.
be5stij
be5stik
be1tw
beur4s
2b1f
2bg
4b3h
1b2i
bid3s4
bi4du
bi5enn
biet5j
bi3eu
bij5a
bij3d
bij3k
bijs2
bij3sl
bij3sm
bin4dr
bin4tj
bio3
bis4a
bi3se
bis4tr
bi1tr
bit4se
2b1j
2b1k
1b4l
5blan
b5led
blet5j
bleus4
3bli
blik3o
4blish
blok3
2b1m
b1n
1bo
bo5de2
boe4ga
boe4kn
boeren5
boe3s4
bo5ko
bo4les
bo2ma
bom3aa
bo4mo
bonai4
bond4s
bon4tj
bon4to
boos4t3
b5orig
bor4st5a
bor4sto
bor4st5r
bos3
bo4sp
bos4ses
bo2su
bo2th
bot3j
bo4tu
bou5ta
boven3
boy5
1b2r2
braat4
b4re
breis4
brei5st
bri4a
bri4l
bro4n
bru2l5
2b1s2
b3s4c
b2sla
bsou4
2b1t2
bt4s3
1bu
buit4j
bus3c
bu2su
b1v
2bw
by5la
byr4
bys4
2b1z
1ca
ca4chem
cae3
cag4
ca2k
came5r
can4nes
ca3pa
ca2pe
ca5ra
cara4t
ca4re.
ca3ro
cas3t
cat2
ca3ta
cate4r
ca3th
2c1c
cca5
cce4s
1ce
cee2
cei4
3cel
celi4n
ce4lop
4cema
ce3na
2ceni
3cent
cen4t5j
4cepa
ce3ra
5cere
ce3r4o
ce2s
ce3s2a
4cesp
ce3su
ce2tj
2ch.
chaar4s
char5t
chas5
4chav
2chc
2che.
4cheb
2cheg
2chek
che4lee
4chemu
4cheor
4chep
3cheq
che3ri
4chero
2ches
2chev
4chg
4chh
chi4k
5chlo
4chm
4chn
cho3s
2chp
3chris
5chromo
2cht
3chum
2chw
1chy5
3ci
ci4al.
cier4s
ci1eu
ci4le.
ci4nen
ci1p
ci4so
ci3t4
ci5ta
c3j
2c2k
cka4
ck1en
ck3ers
c5keten
ck5etk
ck3l
ck3n
cks4
1c2l
cle4v
c4li
cli4q
clo4ne.
clo4se.
cly4
2cn
cno4
1co
3co.
3coa
co5ad
3cod
5co2k
3col
co4le.
colet4
co2lu
3com
3con
con3g
con3s
con5t4
cop4
3copa
co4pe.
co3pr
coquet4
3cor
co3ro
corp2
corps5
cor5s
3cos
3cot
3cou
4cout
co2v
cov5erb
cov5ers
4c1q
c4ques
1c4r2
cra4y
2crib
3cris
5crit
cros4
cross5en
crui4
2c1t
ct3ad
cte2n
c2th
cti4on.
cti4ons
c2tj
ctoi4
c2ton
ct5ond
cto4rin
c2t5re
ctu4re.
1cu
cu4ad
cuk4
3cul
cur3s
5cy
cy4th
c3z
1da
5da.
3daag
4daam
4daanb
d3aanw
4d5aap
4d5acc
d5adel
2d1af
da3fr
da2ga
da4ged
da4g5et
da4gon
dag3op
da4gor
da2gr
da2gu
5dai
5dak.
d4a5ke
5daken
2d3akk
dak3l
da2k3r
4daks
d5aksen
4dalar
4dalm
da2l5u
d2ame
dames5
3dan
da4nas
dan4kl
dan4sm
dans3p
2d1ap
d2ape
3dapes
5dapu
da2ra
2d1arb
3dari
dar2m
darm3a
das3t
5dati4
dat5j
2d5atl
5daue
4d3aut
da4ve.
2d1b4
dbou4wi
2d1c
2d3d2
dde4lev
dde2n
dde4red
dde4ree
dder5o
dde3s
1de
de1ch
deeg5
2deen
5deen.
dee4r
deer5i
dee3t
4deff
4deg.
2dei
de4klaa
de4klag
de4kna
4deksa
de4lac
4delas
del3dr
4delec
del5eeu
4delek
4d3elem
5delen
de4leng
de4lon
del5or
de4lov
del4sl
del4str
del5t
4demai
4demm
d5emme
d4en.
de4nab
den4ac
den4du
de4nep
4d5engt
den4kof
den4kop
den4kr
de2no
den3oo
der5aan
de3rab
de3ras
de4rei
der5ein
de4rem
de4rep
de4ret
der5fr
de4rim
de4rin.
der3k
der3na
der3of
der3on
der4sa
der5th
4derts
der5tw
der1u
de2s
desis5
de4sk
des5kr
de3sl
des4pel
de3sta
des3ti
de5stic
de3sto
de3str
det2
de3ta
4deten
detes5
de3tw
4d5eu4ro
de5us.
dewin4d
2dex
3dex.
2d1f2
2d1g
d4ge.
d4ges.
d3g4l
2d1h
d3he
dher5i
dhun4
1di
dia3s2
dic5k
5die
die2f
dienst5r
diep5l
die5sp
die4tra
di1eu
di2ga
dig3aa
2dijz
d5ijzer
di4ko
dik5w
2dind
d5indi
2dinf
d5ingeni5
din5gh
2dinr
2d1ins
4dinw
4dinz
dis5co
di4sin
dis5t
dit5j
2d1j
2d1k
2d3l
dlan4de
dli2n
2d1m
dmoes4
2d3n
1do
5do.
5doc
2doef
doe2l
5doi
d4ok
dok4r
dol5f
dolk3s
do2mo
dom2s
2d5omz
5don.
2dont
3donti
dont4l
doorn5ac
2dop
do4pe.
do4pes
3dopj
d3o4pl
5doppen
3dopt
d5oree
2d1org
do3ro
dors3m
do3sk
5dovl
2d3p2
dpren4
d2r2
3dra
4drand
4drap
4dras
d4re.
d3rec
d3red
5dreef
d3rege
4d3rel
d5rem.
3dremp
d5rese
d3resu
5dreve
2dric
dri5en
dries4
drie5t
3d4rif
d3rijd
d3rijk
3drijv
3drin
3dris
d3rit
dri2v
4droei
3drog
4drok
d5roman
d3rond
d3rood
4droos
d3rov
d4roy
4d3roz
4drug
drug4s
d3ruim
3druk
4drus
4ds
ds1a
dsa4d
ds2al
dsas3
d3sch
ds4cor
d4sed
d2see
d4sek
dse4la
d3sen
d4ses
dsex2
d5sfeer
d2si
dsi4ga
d2sl
d3slaa
d3slac
ds5lam
d5slang
ds3lie
d3slin
d5s4mak
ds4mee
ds3na
ds3no
d3snu
ds1o
ds2oo
d4spal
d5s4pel
d4spet
d1spi
d4spon
d3spor
ds4pre
d1st
d3sta
d4staal
d4stab
d4staf
d4stal
d3ste
d4stek
d4s5tera
ds3th
d4stit
d2su
d3sur
2d3t2
1du
du4bl
2duil
dui4t
4duitg
du1o
dus3
dut5j
du4wee
2d1v
2d1w
d2wa
d3waar
d3wac
4dwarm
4d3wat
d3weg
d4wei
d3wek
d3wer
d3wes3
d3wet
1dy
4dyo
dy2s3
2d1z
d2zj
e1a
e3aa
e3ac
e4ade.
e4ades
ea2di
ea4dor
ead5s4
ea5fr
ea2gu
e3ai
ea2k
e2akd
e4ake
e4ako
eals4
e2am
e3amb
e5anc
e3and
e3ant
e4anu
e5ap
ea2ri
ea2s
ea5si
e4at.
e2ath
e4atm
eatri4
eatu4
eau4n
eau3s4t
e1b
e5bo
ebo4k
e3br
e3cha
e1che
ech5es.
e1chi
e3cho
echte5ri
ec3le
3econo
ecor2
ec4tin
e1d
4ed.
e3dam
edenk5r
ed3ijz
e2dov
ed5ric
e3dru
edsel3
ed1sp
ed2w
e3dwan
e2e
ee2da
eede5r
ee5do
eed5w
ee2f
eef3l
ee4gli
ee2gr
ee2k
eek5ak
eek1e
ee5ker
eek5lo
eek3n
ee3ko
ee3kri
eek5ro
eek3ur
eek3uu
ee2l
ee3led
ee3li
eel3k
eel4si
2eem
ee2n1
eeng4
een5ie
een3k
een3sl
eep3ac
eer1a
ee2ri
eer5ijz
eer3in
eer3k
eer3om
eer5oom
eer4ov
eers5ag
ee2s
ee3sc
ees4ch
ee4sem
ees3li
ee3smu
ee3spr
ees3te
ee2t
eet3h
eet3oo
eetra4
ee4tw
e5ex
e4fad
ef3da
ef5do
3effec
3effek
ef4fle
e1fl
e4fom
e1f2r
ef3sm
e1g
egas4k
e4gec
ege4las
ege4lov
ege5ner
e4gos
eg3s4
e1h
eid4sp
ei1e
eie3s
e1ij
eil5aar
eil3d
eil3m
ei2lo
e2in
ei4nap
ein4do
eind5oo
ein4dr
ein4du
ei4ned
ei5po
ei4re.
ei2s3a
ei5sla
eis4lo
eis4p
eis4ta
eis4tel
ei5stene
ei5str
eit2
eite5s
ei1tj
ei4too
eit4s
eit3z
5eiwit
e3j2
e3kaa
ekaart5j
e3kam
e3kas
2eke
ek4er
ek2et
e4kez
ek3ins
e5klam
e4klast
e3kled
ek3les
e5klim
e5klin
e4koli
ek3ov
ek4ru
ek1sa
3eksam
3eksem
eks1p
e1kw
e5ky
e1la
e5laag
elaats5t
el1ac
el5adj
el1af
el5appel
el3arb
e4l5arm
e4las.
el5dak
el2dr
5electr
el5eier
5elektr
e2lel
el5elp
e3len
e3lep
e4lert
e4leta
ele4t5j
e3lev
el4faa
el4fend
elf5lo
3elfta
el3gl
elie5t
e3lig
eli5kw
e4lind
e4linga
elings5t
e5lins.
eli4p
el5isw
3elix
elk3s4
ellings5
e1lo
e2lob
e3lok
e2lol
el3oli
e4lom
el5omt
el5ont
eloofs5
e5loos
el3ops
el5opt
el5opv
e2lor
e5loz
els5ag
el4sj
el5smed
els2u
e1lu
eluks5
e1m
ement5j
e5meri
emes3
em3ins
e4mir
5emplacem
en1ac
e2nak
en3akk
e2nal
en5als
en5alt
en5amb
en3ana
e2nap
en3app
e5nari
en5ars
e2nas
en3asi
ena4sp
e2nav
e2naz
en4ce.
en3dar
ende4ra
5enderti
en5dop
en4dur
e2nec
en3ech
en3eil
ene4n3
e4nent
en5epo
e3ner
e4nerf
3energ
e4nerv
e3nes
enes5te
e4nete
en5eter
ene4t5j
e2nex
en3ga
enge3s
engs4
eng5ste
e4nid
enier4t
en5inga
enings5
e4nink
e3nis
4enkl
en4kre
en5krin
e2non
